Tennessee, session 114, HB2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1602(10)(A)(ix), is amended
by deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1602(16), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1607, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(3)(I), (c)(9), and (x)(2)(D) and subsection (p).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1614(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1614(c), is amended by
deleting ", mental health and substance abuse services,".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1620(c)(12), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2100
011537
- 1 -